Nebraska, session 109, LB787.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 55-601, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
55-601 (1) The Commission on Military and Veteran Affairs is created. The
commission shall consist of the following voting members:
(a) The Director of Economic Development or his or her designee;
(b) The Adjutant General or his or her designee;
(c) The Director of Veterans’ Affairs or his or her designee; and
(d) Three residents of the State of Nebraska, one from each congressional
district. At least one of the three residents shall have current or prior
military experience and at least one shall have a background in business.
(2) The commission shall have the following nonvoting, ex officio members:
(a) The veterans' program coordinator of the Department of Labor;
(b) The chairperson chair of the State Committee of Employer Support of
the Guard and Reserve;
(c) The commander of the United States Air Force's 55th Wing of the Air
Combat Command or his or her designee;
(d) The commander of the United States Strategic Command or his or her
designee; and
(e) The commander of the United States Air Force's 557th Weather Wing of
the United States Air Force or his or her designee; .
(f) The commander of the United States Air Force's 95th Wing or his or her
designee;
(g) The commander of the United States Air Force's 90th Missile Wing or
his or her designee;
(h) The Director of the Defense POW/MIA Accounting Agency or his or her
designee;
(i) The Department of Defense service secretary or service component
appointed representative for Nebraska;
(j) The commander of any future wing which may be positioned or
established in Nebraska or his or her designee; and
(k) The commander of any military headquarters located in Nebraska not
represented elsewhere in this section or his or her designee.
(3) The members of the commission described in subdivision (1)(d) of this
section shall be appointed by the Governor. The Governor shall designate the
initial terms of the members described in subdivision (1)(d) of this section so
that one member serves for a term of two years, one member serves for a term of
three years, and one member serves for a term of four years. Succeeding
appointments shall be for terms of four years and shall be made in the same
manner as the original appointments. The terms of the members shall begin on
October 1 of the year in which they are appointed unless appointed to fill a
vacancy. Appointments to fill a vacancy, occurring other than by the expiration
of a term of office, shall be made for the unexpired term of the member whose
office is vacated.
Sec. 2. Section 55-606, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
55-606 The Commission on Military and Veteran Affairs shall prepare a an
annual report at the request of the Governor or upon the commission's own
determination summarizing the military assets of Nebraska, including
installations and missions, and the economic impact of the military assets in
Nebraska. The report shall also include recommendations for preserving and
sustaining military assets and missions existing in Nebraska and
recommendations for actions which the state can take to encourage expanding
such assets and missions. The commission shall submit the report electronically
to the Legislature, the Governor, and the commanding officer of every military
base in Nebraska on or before November 15 of each year.
Sec. 3. Original sections 55-601 and 55-606, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 4. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections 80-328 and
80-330, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-1-